Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.165.037

Compliance with the Washington integrated student supports protocol—Partnerships with out-of-school organizations. (Contingent effective date.)

(1) While the state allocations for the learning assistance program under this chapter are intended to be flexible dollars within the control of the public school and school district, this local control must be balanced with local accountability for improvement in student achievement.

(2) School district boards of directors must budget and expend the appropriations for the learning assistance program, under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, using the framework of the Washington integrated student supports protocol, established under RCW 28A.300.139.

(3) A district may use up to 15 percent of the district's learning assistance program allocation to deliver academic, nonacademic, and social-emotional supports and services to students through partnerships with community-based or other out-of-school organizations in accordance with RCW 28A.300.139. Any agreement entered into by a school district and a community partner in accordance with RCW 28A.300.139 must:

(a) Specify that learning assistance program funds may be used only to provide direct supports and services to students;

(b) Clearly identify the academic, nonacademic, or social-emotional supports and services that will be made available to students by the community partner and how those supports and services align to the needs of the students as identified in the student-level needs assessment required by RCW 28A.300.139; and

(c) Identify the in-school supports that will be reinforced by the supports and services provided by the community partner to promote student progress towards meeting academic standards.

[ 2021 c 111 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2021 c 111 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect at the later of either: (1) The expiration or termination of Proclamation 20-05, and any subsequent orders extending or amending the proclamation, declaring a state of emergency on February 29, 2020, for all counties in Washington due to COVID-19; or (2) September 1, 2025." [ 2021 c 111 s 15.]

Notice of effective and expiration dates—2021 c 111 ss 2 and 3: "The office of the governor must provide written notice of the expiration date of section 2 of this act and the effective date of section 3 of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the office of the governor." [ 2021 c 111 s 16.]

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.